hr-HR: Profil opružne kutije: Iznimno visoki profil; Iznimno niski profil; Visoki profil; Niski profil; Standardni profil; Ostalo
en: Box spring profile: Extra high profile; Extra low profile; High profile; Low profile; Standard profile; Other
sl-SI: Profil vzmetnice: Izjemno visok profil; Izjemno nizek profil; Visok profil; Nizek profil; Standardni profil; Drugo
fr: Profil de sommier tapissier: Profil très haut; Profil très bas; Profil haut; Profil bas; Profil standard; Autre
ru: Профиль пружинного блока: Сверхвысокий профиль; Сверхнизкий профиль; Высокий профиль; Низкий профиль; Стандартный профиль; Другое
bg-BG: Профил на подматрачната рамка: Екстра висок профил; Екстра нисък профил; Висок профил; Нисък профил; Стандартен профил; Други
ro-RO: Profil suport pentru saltele: Profil foarte înalt; Profil foarte jos; Profil înalt; Profil jos; Profil standard; Altele
lt-LT: Lovos pagrindo profilis: Itin aukšto profilio; Itin žemo profilio; Aukšto profilio; Žemo profilio; Standartinio profilio; Kitas
sv: Resårprofil: Extra hög profil; Extra låg profil; Hög profil; Låg profil; Standardprofil; Övrigt
pl: Profil box spring: Bardzo wysoki profil; Bardzo niski profil; Wysoki profil; Niski profil; Profil standardowy; Inne
vi: Kiểu dáng khung lò xo: Dáng rất cao; Dáng rất thấp; Dáng cao; Dáng thấp; Dáng tiêu chuẩn; Khác
nb: Profil for boksmadrass: Ekstra høy profil; Ekstra lav profil; Høy profil; Lav profil; Standardprofil; Annet
de: Profil des Boxspringbetts: Extra hohes Profil; Extra niedriges Profil; Hohes Profil; Niedriges Profil; Standardprofil; Sonstige
hu: Rugós ágyalap profilja: Extra magas profil; Extra alacsony profil; Magas profil; Alacsony profil; Standard profil; Egyéb
th: ลักษณะฐานรองที่นอนแบบสปริง: โครงสูงพิเศษ; โครงต่ำพิเศษ; โครงสูง; โครงต่ำ; โครงมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
nl: Boxspring profiel: Extra hoog profiel; Extra laag profiel; Hoog profiel; Laag profiel; Standaardprofiel; Overig
ja: ボックススプリングプロファイル: エクストラハイプロファイル; エクストラロープロファイル; ハイプロファイル; ロープロファイル; スタンダードプロファイル; その他
es: Perfil del somier: Perfil extra alto; Perfil extra bajo; Perfil alto; Perfil bajo; Perfil estándar; Otro
el: Προφίλ πλαισίου με ελατήρια: Πολύ ψηλό προφίλ; Πολύ χαμηλό προφίλ; Ψηλό προφίλ; Χαμηλό προφίλ; Κανονικό προφίλ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Profil pružinového rámu: Extra vysoký profil; Extra nízky profil; Vysoký profil; Nízky profil; Štandardný profil; Iný
tr: Yaylı baza profili: Ekstra yüksek profil; Ekstra düşük profil; Yüksek profil; Düşük profil; Standart profil; Diğer
zh-TW: 床箱厚度: 特高型; 特低型; 高型; 低型; 標準型; 其他
fi: Joustinpatjan profiili: Erittäin korkea profiili; Erittäin matala profiili; Korkea profiili; Matala profiili; Vakioprofiili; Muu
it: Profilo della molla a molle: Profilo extra alto; Profilo extra basso; Profilo alto; Profilo basso; Profilo standard; Altro
da: Profil af boxmadras: Ekstra høj profil; Ekstra lav profil; Høj profil; Lav profil; Standardprofil; Andet
zh-CN: 盒簧高度规格: 超高型; 超低型; 高型; 低型; 标准型; 其他
pt-PT: Perfil do estrado de molas: Perfil extra alto; Perfil extra baixo; Perfil alto; Perfil baixo; Perfil standard; Outro
pt-BR: Perfil do estrado de molas: Perfil extra alto; Perfil extra baixo; Perfil alto; Perfil baixo; Perfil padrão; Outro
ko: 박스 스프링 높이 유형: 엑스트라 하이 프로파일; 엑스트라 로우 프로파일; 하이 프로파일; 로우 프로파일; 스탠다드 프로파일; 기타
cs: Výška profilu pružinové základny (boxspringu): Extra vysoký profil; Extra nízký profil; Vysoký profil; Nízký profil; Standardní profil; Jiné